Utah statutes.
75-5-212.   Resignation or removal proceedings.
(1) Any person interested in the welfare of a ward, or the ward, if 14 or more
years of age, may petition for removal of a guardian on the ground that
removal would be in the best interest of the ward. A guardian may petition for
permission to resign. A petition for removal or for permission to resign may,
but need not, include a request for appointment of a successor guardian.
(2)  After notice and hearing on a petition for removal or for permission to
resign, the court may terminate the guardianship and make any further order
that may be appropriate.
(3)  If, at any time in the proceeding, the court determines that the
interests of the ward are, or may be, inadequately represented, it may appoint
an attorney to represent the minor, giving consideration to the preference of
the minor if the minor is 14 or more years of age.
